Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-112] Business transactions
between a partner and the partnership. A partner may lend money
to and transact other business with the limited partnership and has the same
rights and obligations with respect to the loan or other transaction as a person
who is not a partner. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next